District of Columbia statutes.
1-1061.05

Overseas voter’s registration address.

In registering to vote, an overseas voter who is eligible to vote in the District must be assigned to the voting precinct of the address of the last place of residence of the voter in the District, or, in the case of a voter described by § 1-1061.02(2)(E), the address of the last place of residence in the District of the parent or legal guardian of the voter. If that address is no longer a recognized residential address, the voter must be assigned an address for voting purposes.

June 5, 2012, D.C. Law 19-137, § 105, 59 DCR 2542
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 5 of the Uniform Military and Overseas Voters Act.